Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4213.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5o. (1) Subject to subsection (5), an individual licensed under this act to carry a concealed pistol, or who is exempt from licensure under section 12a(h), shall not carry a concealed pistol on the premises of any of the following: (a) A school or school property except that a parent or legal guardian of a student of the school is not precluded from carrying a concealed pistol while in a vehicle on school property, if he or she is dropping the student off at the school or picking up the student from the school. As used in this section, "school" and "school property" mean those terms as defined in section 237a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.237a. (b) A public or private child care center or day care center, public or private child caring institution, or public or private child placing agency. (c) A sports arena or stadium. (d) A a bar or tavern licensed under the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1101 to 436.2303, where the primary source of income of the business is the sale of alcoholic liquor by the glass and consumed on the premises. This subdivision subsection does not apply to an owner or employee of the business. The Michigan liquor control commission shall develop and make available to holders of licenses under the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1101 to 436.2303, an appropriate sign stating that "This establishment prohibits patrons from carrying concealed weapons". The owner or operator of an establishment licensed under the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1101 to 436.2303, may post the sign developed under this subdivision.subsection. (e) Any property or facility owned or operated by a church, synagogue, mosque, temple, or other place of worship, unless the presiding official or officials of the church, synagogue, mosque, temple, or other place of worship permit the carrying of concealed pistol on that property or facility. (f) An entertainment facility with a seating capacity of 2,500 or more individuals that the individual knows or should know has a seating capacity of 2,500 or more individuals or that has a sign above each public entrance stating in letters not less than 1-inch high a seating capacity of 2,500 or more individuals. (g) A hospital. (h) A dormitory or classroom of a community college, college, or university. (2) Subject to subsection (5), an individual shall not carry a portable device that uses electro-muscular disruption technology on any of the premises described in subsection (1). (3) An individual licensed under this act to carry a concealed pistol, or who is exempt from licensure under section 12a(h), shall not carry a concealed pistol in violation of R 432.1212 of the Michigan Administrative Code promulgated under the Michigan gaming control Gaming Control and revenue act, Revenue Act, 1996 IL 1, MCL 432.201 to 432.226. (4) As used in subsection (1), "premises" does not include parking areas of the places premises identified under subsection (1). (5) Subsections (1) and (2) do not apply to any of the following: (a) An individual licensed under this act who is a retired police officer, retired law enforcement officer, or retired federal law enforcement officer. (b) An individual who is licensed under this act and who is employed or contracted by an entity described under subsection (1) to provide security services and is required by his or her the individual's employer or the terms of a contract to carry a concealed firearm on the premises of the employing or contracting entity. (c) An individual who is licensed as a private investigator or private detective under the professional investigator licensure act, 1965 PA 285, MCL 338.821 to 338.851. (d) An individual who is licensed under this act and who is a corrections officer of a county sheriff's department or who is licensed under this act and is a retired corrections officer of a county sheriff's department, if that individual has received county sheriff approved weapons training. (e) An individual who is licensed under this act and who is a motor carrier officer or capitol security officer of the department of state police. (f) An individual who is licensed under this act and who is a member of a sheriff's posse. (g) An individual who is licensed under this act and who is an auxiliary officer or reserve officer of a police or sheriff's department. (h) An individual who is licensed under this act and who is any of the following: (i) A parole, probation, or corrections officer, or absconder recovery unit member, of the department of corrections, if that individual has obtained a Michigan department of corrections weapons permit. (ii) A retired parole, probation, or corrections officer, or retired absconder recovery unit member, of the department of corrections, if that individual has obtained a Michigan department of corrections weapons permit. (i) A state court judge or state court retired judge who is licensed under this act. (j) An individual who is licensed under this act and who is a court officer. (k) An individual who is licensed under this act and who is a peace officer. (6) An individual who violates this section subsection (1), (2), or (3) is responsible for a state civil infraction or guilty of a crime as follows: (a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the individual is responsible for a state civil infraction and may be fined not more than $500.00. The court shall order the individual's license to carry a concealed pistol suspended for 6 months. (b) For a second violation, the individual is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.00. The court shall order the individual's license to carry a concealed pistol revoked. (c) For a third or subsequent violation, the individual is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. The court shall order the individual's license to carry a concealed pistol revoked. (7) The owner or operator of any premises not described in subsection (1) or (3) that prohibits an individual from carrying a concealed pistol on those premises shall ensure that the premises include all of the following when the premises are open to the public: (a) Metal detectors at every entrance to the premises. (b) The presence of an individual employed by or contracted by the owner or operator to provide security services on the premises.